Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-517
Petition; bond; requirements.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on the petition, a bond shall be filed in the amount of two thousand dollars, with security approved by the Chief Water Officer to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district be not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the Chief Water Officer shall be satisfied that the bond first executed is insufficient in amount, the Chief Water Officer may require the execution of an additional bond within a time to be fixed at not less than ten days distant. Upon a failure of the petitioner to execute the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 5, p. 528;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 154.